Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,126
Violation; action to enjoin.

The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment or the State Fire Marshal may apply to the district court of the county where the violation is occurring or about to occur for a restraining order, a temporary or permanent injunction, or a mandatory injunction against any person violating or threatening to violate the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act or the rules, regulations, or orders adopted and promulgated under the act. The court shall have jurisdiction to grant relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.

Laws 1986, LB 217, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 64;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 125;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 415.